Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE 1

DEFINITIONS

PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

§431:1-100 Short title. This chapter
shall be known and may be cited as the Insurance Code. [L 1987, c 347, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next